Washington statutes.
RCW 19.110.050

Persons proposing to sell or lease business opportunity—Registration required—Application—Renewal—Denial, suspension, or revocation of registration.

(1) Any person who proposes to sell or lease a business opportunity must register prior to advertising, soliciting, or making any offer, sale, or lease in this state.

(2) Any person proposing to sell or lease a business opportunity must apply for registration by filing with the director:

(a) A copy of the disclosure document required by RCW 19.110.070;

(b) An irrevocable consent to service of process;

(c) The prescribed registration fee; and

(d) Copies of all advertisements intended to be used in connection with the offer and sale of the business opportunity.

(3) If the application meets the requirements for registration, the director shall issue a registration number to the applicant. The applicant must include the number in every advertisement in this state.

(4) Registration is effective for one year. An applicant must renew registration annually unless the director extends the duration of registration in order to stagger renewal periods. The renewal application must contain:

(a) Any new information necessary to comply with the disclosure requirements of RCW 19.110.070;

(b) The prescribed renewal fee; and

(c) Copies of any and all advertisements intended to be used in connection with the offer and sale of the business opportunity.

(5) The applicant must amend the registration whenever there is any material change in the required information.

(6) The applicant must file copies of all advertisements offering business opportunities seven days before their intended use.

(7) The director may issue an order denying, suspending, or revoking any applicant's registration if the director finds that the order is in the public interest and that:

(a) The registration application is incomplete or contains any statement which is false or misleading with respect to any material fact; or

(b) Any provision of this chapter or any rule or order lawfully imposed under this chapter has been violated; or

(c) The business opportunity includes or would include activities which are illegal; or

(d) The business opportunity has worked or tended to work a fraud on purchasers or would so operate.

(8) The director shall promptly notify the applicant of any order denying, suspending, or revoking registration. The applicant may request a hearing within fifteen days of notification. If the applicant does not request a hearing, the order remains in effect until the director modifies or vacates it. The applicant shall be notified of the right to request a hearing within fifteen days.

[ 1981 c 155 s 5.]